Washington statutes.
RCW 28B.102.045

Conditional scholarship program—Satisfactory progress required.

To receive additional disbursements under a conditional scholarship program authorized by this chapter, a participant must be considered by his or her Washington professional educator standards board-approved educator preparation program to be in a satisfactory progress condition.

[ 2019 c 295 s 214; 2004 c 58 s 5; 1988 c 125 s 7.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28A.310.235.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See notes following RCW 28B.10.033.

Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28B.102.030.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.415.265.

Findings—Intent—2019 c 295: See note following RCW 28A.180.120.